test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_31si_vuosi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vuosi - ok : # Noun 'år' n_31si - ok
     vuosi+N+Sg+Nom: vuosi
     vuosi+N+Sg+Gen: vuođen
     vuosi+N+Sg+Par: vuotta
     vuosi+N+Sg+Tra: vuođeksi
     vuosi+N+Sg+Abe: vuođetta
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ine: vuođessa
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ela: vuođesta
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ill: vuotheen
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ade: vuođela
     vuosi+N+Sg+Abl: vuođelta
     vuosi+N+Sg+All: vuođele
     vuosi+N+Sg+Ess: vuotena
     vuosi+N+Pl+Nom: vuođet
     vuosi+N+Pl+Gen: [vuossiin, vuositten] # vuossiin Por ja Rai varieteeteissä
     vuosi+N+Pl+Par: vuossii
     vuosi+N+Pl+Tra: vuosiksi
     vuosi+N+Pl+Abe: vuositta
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ine: vuosissa
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ela: vuosista
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ill: vuoshiin
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ade: vuosila
     vuosi+N+Pl+Abl: vuosilta
     vuosi+N+Pl+All: vuosile
     vuosi+N+Pl+Ess: vuosina
     vuosi+N+Pl+Com: vuosine
